bhojpuri.dix
    <pardef n="कवन/__pro_a">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेके</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेसे</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेम्में</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेपर</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नके</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नसे</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न्में</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न्पर</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="क/वन__pro_a">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेके</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेसे</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेम्में</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेपर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेनके</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेनसे</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेन्में</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेन्पर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="क/ेहु__pro_a">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोइ</l>
          <r>ेहु<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोइके</l>
          <r>ेहु<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोइसे</l>
          <r>ेहु<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेम्हउँ</l>
          <r>ेहु<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेहुपर</l>
          <r>ेहु<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेन्हु</l>
          <r>ेहु<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेन्हुके</l>
          <r>ेहु<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेन्हुसे</l>
          <r>ेहु<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेन्हुमें</l>
          <r>ेहु<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेन्हुपर</l>
          <r>ेहु<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सब/__pro_a">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>से</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>में</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>पर</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/उ__pro_a_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>वोहि</l>
          <r>उ<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओहिके</l>
          <r>उ<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओहिसे</l>
          <r>उ<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओहिमें</l>
          <r>उ<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओहिपर</l>
          <r>उ<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उनहि</l>
          <r>उ<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उनहिZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>उ<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उनहिZथ्ण्झ्से</l>
          <r>उ<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओन्मइ</l>
          <r>उ<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उनहिZथ्ण्झ्पर</l>
          <r>उ<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="सब">
      <i>सब</i>
      <par n="सब/__pro_a" />
    </e>
    <e lm="क">
      <i>क</i>
      <par n="क/ेहु__pro_a" />
    </e>
    <e lm="क">
      <i>क</i>
      <par n="क/वन__pro_a" />
    </e>
    <e lm="">
      <i />
      <par n="/उ__pro_a_eo" />
    </e>
